Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6825
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-6825 to 44-6833 shall be known and may be cited as the Managed Care Emergency Services Act.

Laws 1997, LB 279, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 44-6801;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 17.